Utah statutes.
31A-37a-205.   Sponsored captives.
In addition to the other provisions of this chapter, this section applies to a
sponsored captive insurance company under Chapter 37, Captive Insurance
Companies Act, that has a certificate of authority as a special purpose
financial captive insurance company pursuant to this chapter.
(1)  A sponsored captive insurance company may have a certificate of authority
as a special purpose financial captive insurance company under this chapter.
(2) (a)  For purposes of a sponsored captive insurance company having a
certificate of authority as a special purpose financial captive insurance
company, "general account" means the assets and liabilities of the sponsored
captive insurance company not attributable to a protected cell.
(b)  For purposes of applying Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership Act, to a
sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of authority as a
special purpose financial captive insurance company, the definition of
"insolvency" and "insolvent" in Section 31A-37a-102 shall be applied
separately to:
(i)  each protected cell; and
(ii)  the special purpose financial captive insurance company's general
account.
(3) (a)  A participant in a sponsored captive insurance company having a
certificate of authority as a special purpose financial captive insurance
company must be a ceding insurer, unless approved by the commissioner before a
person becomes a participant.
(b)  A change in a participant in a sponsored captive insurance company having
a certificate of authority as a special purpose financial captive insurance
company is subject to prior approval by the commissioner.
(4)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-37-401, a special purpose financial captive
insurance company that is a sponsored captive insurance company may issue a
security to a person not described in Section 31A-37-401 if the issuance to
that person is approved by the commissioner before the issuance of the
security.
(5)  Notwithstanding Section 31A-37a-302, a sponsored captive insurance
company having a certificate of authority as a special purpose financial
captive insurance company shall:
(a)  at the time of initial application for a certificate of authority as a
special purpose financial captive insurance company, possess unimpaired paid-
in capital and surplus of not less than $500,000; and
(b)  maintain at least $500,000 of unimpaired paid-in capital and surplus of
not less than $500,000 during the time that it holds a certificate of
authority under this chapter.
(6) (a)  For purposes of a sponsored captive insurance company having a
certificate of authority as a special purpose financial captive insurance
company, this Subsection (6) applies to:
(i)  a security issued by the special purpose financial captive insurance
company with respect to a protected cell; or
(ii)  a contract or obligation of the special purpose financial captive
insurance company with respect to a protected cell.
(b)  A sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of authority
as a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall include with a
security, contract, or obligation described in Subsection (6)(a):
(i)  the designation of the protected cell; and
(ii)  a disclosure in a form and content satisfactory to the commissioner to
the effect that the holder of the security or a counterparty to the contract
or obligation has no right or recourse against the special purpose financial
captive insurance company and its assets other than against an asset properly
attributable to the protected cell.
(c)  Notwithstanding the requirements of this Subsection (6) and subject to
other statutes or rules including this chapter and Chapter 37, Captive
Insurance Companies Act, a creditor, ceding insurer, or another person may not
use a failure to include a disclosure described in Subsection (6)(b), in whole
or part, as the sole basis to have recourse against:
(i)  the general account of the special purpose financial captive insurance
company; or
(ii)  the assets of another protected cell of the special financial captive
insurance company.
(7)  In addition to Section 31A-37-401, a sponsored captive insurance company
having a certificate of authority as a special purpose financial captive
insurance company is subject to the following with respect to a protected
cell:
(a) (i)  A sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of
authority as a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall
establish a protected cell only for the purpose of insuring or reinsuring
risks of one or more reinsurance contracts with a ceding insurer with the
intent of facilitating an insurance securitization.
(ii)  Subject to Subsection (7)(a)(iii), a sponsored captive insurance company
having a certificate of authority as a special purpose financial captive
insurance company shall establish a separate protected cell with respect to a
ceding insurer described in Subsection (7)(a)(i).
(iii)  A sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of authority
as a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall establish a
separate protected cell with respect to each reinsurance contract that is
funded in whole or in part by a separate insurance securitization transaction.
(b)  A sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of authority
as a special purpose financial captive insurance company may not sale,
exchange, or transfer an asset by, between, or among any of its protected
cells without the prior approval of the commissioner.
(8) (a)  A sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of
authority as a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall
attribute an asset or liability to a protected cell and to the general account
in accordance with the plan of operation approved by the commissioner.
(b)  Except as provided by Subsection (8)(a), a sponsored captive insurance
company having a certificate of authority as a special purpose financial
captive insurance company may not attribute an asset or liability between:
(i)  its general account and a protected cell; or
(ii)  its protected cells.
(c)  A sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of authority
as a special purpose financial captive insurance company shall attribute:
(i)  an insurance obligation, asset, or liability relating to a reinsurance
contract entered into with respect to a protected cell; and
(ii)  an insurance securitization transaction related to the obligation,
asset, or liability described in Subsection (8)(c)(i), including a security
issued by the special purpose financial captive insurance company as part of
the insurance securitization, to the protected cell.
(d)  The following shall reflect an insurance obligation, asset, or liability
relating to a reinsurance contract and the insurance securitization
transaction that are attributed to a protected cell:
(i)  a right, benefit, obligation, or a liability of a security attributable
to a protected cell described in Subsection (8)(c);
(ii)  the performance under a reinsurance contract and the related insurance
securitization transaction; and
(iii)  a tax benefit, loss, refund, or credit allocated pursuant to a tax
allocation agreement to which the special purpose financial captive insurance
company is a party, including a payment made by or due to be made to the
special purpose financial captive insurance company pursuant to the terms of
the tax allocation agreement.
(9)  In addition to Section 31A-37a-502:
(a)  Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership Act, applies to each protected cell of
a sponsored captive insurance company having a certificate of authority as a
special purpose financial captive insurance company.
(b)  A proceeding or action taken by the commissioner pursuant to Chapter 27a,
Insurer Receivership Act, with respect to a protected cell of a sponsored
captive insurance company having a certificate of authority as a special
purpose financial captive insurance company may not be the sole basis for a
proceeding pursuant to Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership Act, with respect to:
(i)  another protected cell of the special purpose financial captive insurance
company; or
(ii)  the special purpose financial captive insurance company's general
account.
(c) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (9)(c)(ii), the receiver of a
special purpose financial captive insurance company shall ensure that the
assets attributable to one protected cell are not applied to the liabilities
attributable to:
(A)  another protected cell; or
(B)  the special purpose financial captive insurance company's general
account.
(ii)  Notwithstanding Subsection (9)(c)(i), if an asset or liability is
attributable to more than one protected cell, the receiver shall deal with the
asset or liability in accordance with the terms of a relevant governing
instrument or contract.
(d)  The insolvency of a protected cell of a sponsored captive insurance
company having a certificate of authority as a special purpose financial
captive insurance company may not be the sole basis for the commissioner to
prohibit:
(i)  a payment by the special purpose financial captive insurance company made
pursuant to a special purpose financial captive insurance company security or
reinsurance contract with respect to another protected cell; or
(ii)  an action required to make a payment described in Subsection (9)(d)(i).
